auto-hyph.dic
.ka1min.
.Pal1ju.
.pi1kad.
.tal1ve.
.tu1gev.
.vas1tu.
.ot1sas.
.Mu1red.
.Taa1di.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: teeks
.Ai1täh.
.nõn1da.
.ol1nud.
.vaa1ta.
.poo1li.
.sa1bas.
.mak1sa.
.kar1ta.
.um1bes.
.sa1lus.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: ootab
.pük1se.
.jät1ta.
.ot1siv.
.nõe1la.
.nii1ti.
.kül1vi.
.pi1hus.
.Sa1mal.
.ek1sid.
.kir1ja.
.kaa1re.
.jär1ge.
.ven1di.
.Too1li.
.ui1nus.
.ra1het.
.lus1ti.
.Rei1nu.
.ta1res.
.näo1le.
.ve1dis.
.ase1me.
.ke1vad.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: sooks
.õue1le.
.rin1gi.
.tõt1tu.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: avast
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: igast
.Tu1led.
.ai1tan.
.õi1gel.
.pes1ta.
.eh1mus.
.ki1vil.
.vet1te.
.mü1hal.
.ai1mas.
.ma1dal.
.Sü1gis.
.ra1hul.
.lu1bad.
.saa1ti.
.tah1te.
.paa1re.
.pe1sed.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: neiul
.puu1de.
.pär1li.
.Kü1las.
.soo1la.
.pa1ged.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: ojast
.eda1si.
.pu1hus.
.tae1va.
.jal1ge.
.jäl1le.
.suu1na.
.too1me.
.Ju1tud.
.Ar1mas.
.põl1du.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: ajalt
.Tal1le.
.Ko1dus.
.Saa1li.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: Mailt
.vih1ma.
.ok1sad.
.Tub1li.
.Tu1len.
.nä1gid.
.lõu1na.
.Ke1vad.
.kur1si.
.an1nab.
.su1vel.
.kü1sis.
.ma1gab.
.ko1sub.
.vak1sa.
.ko1sis.
.Pa1lun.
.lõp1pu.
.üm1ber.
.koh1ti.
.pih1ta.
.õu1nad.
.kui1gi.
.tu1led.
.ras1ke.
.os1kas.
.lõ1bus.
.em1bas.
.Mu1res.
.Si1nus.
.põs1ke.
.lak1ka.
.jõu1du.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: kauem
.käi1ma.
.häs1ti.
.mõ1nel.
.kin1ni.
.jõu1ga.
.Ela1da.
.kar1da.
.lu1bab.
.hin1ge.
.pä1ris.
.ker1ra.
.aas1ta.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: oleks
.sil1mi.
.tal1lu.
.vei1di.
.ela1ma.
.koo1tu.
.la1sin.
.Va1nem.
.va1rem.
.mu1res.
.kü1las.
.kor1di.
.tun1ne.
.soo1ja.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: Klaas
.mär1ka.
.päe1vi.
.puh1ta.
.õh1tul.
.suu1re.
.pan1na.
.te1hes.
.Al1gul.
.Sin1na.
.va1her.
.va1rud.
.va1nas.
.en1dal.
.lu1kus.
.taa1ti.
.kä1sib.
.lii1ga.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: eluks
.ret1ki.
.lin1de.
.il1mas.
.hul1gi.
.sis1se.
.loo1mi.
.pa1lun.
.sin1na.
.si1nul.
.vä1sis.
.an1tud.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: suust
.sir1gu.
.jäe1ta.
.muu1gi.
.tea1da.
.hul1ka.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: uuris
.tül1li.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: Unelm
.Ja1lad.
.jõu1da.
.ea1les.
.ar1vas.
.hul1ga.
.vaa1se.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: võiks
.müü1ma.
.pa1lus.
.Tõu1ku.
.suu1da.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: saaks
.lee1gi.
.Te1mas.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: meelt
.väi1ta.
.läi1gi.
.su1kis.
.En1näe.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: tirts
.pu1ges.
.sa1dam.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: klaas
.sa1tub.
.poe1ga.
.sae1ti.
.te1mas.
.kat1ki.
.tak1ti.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: õuest
.pea1me.
.kat1ma.
.pul1ma.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: eemal
.tul1la.
.ko1get.
.ko1gus.
.poo1le.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: ajaks
.ruu1mi.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: köied
.ot1sid.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: puust
.as1tus.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: pääle
.ae1tud.
.kau1pa.
.Os1kad.
.pui1du.
.Hin1da.
.loo1ta.
.rub1la.
.õr1nad.
.su1ges.
.Ne1mad.
.Mõ1nel.
.kä1tes.
.mis1ki.
.hää1le.
.see1ga.
.lä1heb.
.ene1se.
.kok1ku.
.Nen1de.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: alust
.ta1hab.
.tee1le.
.Kee1gi.
.See1ga.
.kah1ju.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: verst
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: tants
.lä1him.
.Va1nus.
.vai1ki.
.ot1sus.
.ni1mel.
.lap1se.
.pu1del.
.ot1sis.
.lau1sa.
.pau1na.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: teist
.lai1ne.
.nä1hes.
.mat1ma.
.sa1mal.
.nut1ta.
.kot1ti.
.va1hel.
.ko1bas.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: toast
.mus1ta.
.töö1le.
.peo1ga.
.ris1ti.
.oma1se.
.õde1de.
.müt1si.
.Pea1gi.
.jut1tu.
.üdi1ni.
.lu1bas.
.köö1gi.
.võt1ta.
.sea1da.
.mit1te.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: Kalts
.jõk1ke.
.ala1ti.
.õie1ti.
.anu1ma.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: poiss
.is1tub.
.pa1pad.
.pae1la.
.sel1ga.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: neilt
.vee1ta.
.tu1lid.
.va1lid.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: ootus
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: Võiks
.mõ1ned.
.sal1li.
.pi1sut.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: meist
.pae1lu.
.Mõn1da.
.nõu1tu.
.al1les.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: peaks
.har1va.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: loits
.ula1ta.
.köi1da.
.hoi1da.
.sel1ja.
.toe1ka.
.uk1sed.
.sü1gis.
.Kui1gi.
.Gil1di.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: õhuks
.hoo1li.
.teh1ta.
.abi1tu.
.bon1ne.
.ka1hes.
.lok1ke.
.Lii1ga.
.ha1jus.
.las1ta.
.elu1tu.
.mõ1nes.
.vea1tu.
.ol1nut.
.sü1les.
.kor1gi.
.ava1da.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: lonks
.ka1pis.
.las1ti.
.su1las.
.ke1set.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: tööst
.toa1ke.
.ma1jal.
.lil1le.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: õlult
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: näost
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: lüües
.kas1se.
.Vae1ne.
.hä1vib.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: näeks
.min1di.
.esi1le.
.huu1pi.
.lau1se.
.lin1na.
.tal1le.
.ühi1ne.
.joo1du.
.poi1si.
.ak1nad.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: jõuab
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: juues
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: maalt
.kõr1ge.
.kõi1ke.
.när1ve.
.käh1ku.
.une1le.
.lei1du.
.koh1ta.
.lõk1se.
.nor1gu.
.aja1ma.
.pra1gu.
.põ1sel.
.jäi1gi.
.pli1ka.
.ar1vul.
.bal1le.
.uh1ked.
.oli1gi.
.ko1hal.
.va1rul.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: praks
.pee1ne.
.ol1les.
.lii1ki.
.bal1li.
.val1ge.
.Kõi1gi.
.tea1gi.
.la1sus.
.maa1de.
.Mis1ki.
.kil1de.
.üt1leb.
.nõr1ka.
.tu1lin.
.põl1le.
.väl1ja.
.ku1jul.
.pi1din.
.täh1ti.
.öel1da.
.sõi1ta.
.pe1red.
.kan1da.
.kal1du.
.Ava1ma.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: uuest
.lo1hed.
.kin1ga.
.löö1ma.
.ne1mad.
.oma1da.
.sõi1du.
.ese1me.
.mui1du.
.noo1re.
.peo1le.
.pai1ka.
.en1näe.
.soo1vi.
.pal1ju.
.me1hel.
.tü1tar.
.rau1ka.
.üht1ki.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: Veuve
.päe1va.
.kül1ma.
.sõ1nas.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: näolt
.va1jus.
.tä1nas.
.sep1pa.
.Nõn1da.
.kel1la.
.il1mub.
.min1na.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: jõust
.Tei1ne.
.kau1ge.
.ter1ve.
.näe1te.
.oda1va.
.pi1das.
.täi1de.
.saa1ta.
.lo1het.
.mõ1jud.
.Vih1ma.
.väl1ju.
.Tih1ti.
.pan1ge.
.ruu1ge.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: omast
.rum1mi.
.ot1sem.
.öi1ses.
.va1his.
.hei1na.
.möö1da.
.mul1la.
.lõh1na.
.vae1se.
.elu1le.
.lii1va.
.kor1da.
.pil1gu.
.püs1ti.
.ai1tas.
.la1hel.
.ain1sa.
.kan1du.
.ko1has.
.Sam1mu.
.ti1rib.
.ve1das.
.sam1mu.
.tu1leb.
.eri1ti.
.põl1ve.
.tol1le.
.pin1du.
.püü1da.
.het1ke.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: klaar
.is1tus.
.pih1ku.
.sel1le.
.mu1jal.
.vil1tu.
.tun1di.
.lõi1vu.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: tööks
.si1lis.
.Ees1ti.
.õla1le.
.lä1hen.
.oma1de.
.pii1ga.
.Ta1had.
.töö1ga.
.är1kas.
.jõu1ka.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: punkt
.ai1nus.
.õhu1ke.
.lõ1pus.
.kel1le.
.lah1ti.
.pea1le.
.al1gul.
.ja1las.
.muu1ta.
.lo1bid.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: unest
.hir1mu.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: käest
.sa1mas.
.pa1rem.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: poolt
.mär1ku.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: komps
.lak1ke.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: öösel
.lei1da.
.pad1ja.
.mär1ke.
.ole1ma.
.und1ki.
.Sel1le.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: neist
.pu1hul.
.see1gi.
.ja1gus.
.Tõu1gu.
.tak1ka.
.Poi1si.
.mil1le.
.ta1bas.
.roo1sa.
FAILED TO HYPHENATE: imeks
.Pa1ni.
.uk1se.
.Ma1ri.
.tü1li.
.ke1na.
.õr1na.
.Te1ma.
.me1ri.
.ku1ma.
.Mi1da.
.ti1te.
.ku1ju.
.am1me.
.te1ha.
.An1na.
.kä1su.
.to1hi.
.pu1ha.
.ri1su.
.Kü1si.
.mõ1te.
.Re1ne.
.ma1nu.
.hä1mu.
.po1ja.
.ki1sa.
.ot1sa.
.pä1ri.
.ot1se.
.Är1gu.
.ha1le.
.va1nu.
.ve1te.
.üt1le.
.Va1li.
.pi1me.
.pe1si.
.me1re.
.pä1he.
.õh1tu.
.ko1ja.
.Mõ1ne.
.eh1te.
.Ik1ka.
.ja1nu.
.hõ1be.
.la1se.
.nä1ha.
.se1da.
.ve1si.
.Pe1se.
.Ko1he.
.õl1ga.
.Är1ka.
.är1ka.
.ko1he.
.tä1na.
.Ja1nu.
.Ük1si.
.me1he.
.võ1ta.
.mi1ne.
.üh1te.
.sõ1na.
.ap1pi.
.ka1he.
.ve1ri.
.tu1li.
.ja1gu.
.Si1na.
.te1da.
.ke1ti.
.võ1ti.
.te1gi.
.ta1he.
.ja1la.
.Kö1ha.
.mu1re.
.it1ta.
.õu1na.
.hõ1re.
.Va1na.
.pa1ni.
.ja1ki.
.ae1da.
.ma1ha.
.pe1su.
.Te1re.
.jõ1gi.
.äs1ja.
.pi1ka.
.hä1da.
.Jä1ta.
.La1se.
.mu1ru.
.ka1ta.
.Jõ1gi.
.te1ma.
.tu1ju.
.tu1le.
.pi1hu.
.Su1vi.
.Si1nu.
.su1ve.
.vi1ha.
.Mi1nu.
.Kü1la.
.Mi1na.
.ih1ka.
.lõ1pu.
.ku1hu.
.ku1ni.
.as1ju.
.ti1ba.
.Su1ve.
.uh1ke.
.sa1ja.
.he1le.
.ik1ka.
.pa1ha.
.os1ta.
.va1ru.
.na1li.
.jä1ta.
.kõ1va.
.Ol1gu.
.lä1bi.
.Ri1da.
.kü1la.
.üs1na.
.te1gu.
.nu1ta.
.Ve1si.
.si1su.
.üh1ti.
.su1la.
.Võ1ta.
.su1hu.
.Tu1le.
.ta1sa.
.os1ka.
.ak1na.
.ai1ta.
.as1ja.
.me1si.
.pi1ki.
.ve1re.
.nä1gi.
.hu1vi.
.ah1ju.
.ko1du.
.uh1ta.
.kä1si.
.ta1ha.
.sü1da.
.Tu1li.
.ke1ha.
.si1na.
.mi1na.
.ki1vi.
.Tõ1si.
.po1le.
.jõ1ge.
.ai1na.
.an1na.
.Po1le.
.mi1nu.
.õh1ku.
.lä1he.
.Ku1hu.
.ku1hi.
.tü1hi.
.ok1si.
.Sa1ma.
.na1gu.
.Mi1tu.
.Ko1gu.
.ko1ti.
.mi1tu.
.Ra1ha.
.Se1da.
.ki1hi.
.ke1da.
.ko1ha.
.sa1du.
.Tu1ba.
.ei1le.
.Me1re.
.nä1gu.
.la1si.
.an1da.
.vo1li.
.te1ra.
.Na1gu.
.ma1ga.
.si1nu.
.õi1ge.
.ka1te.
.tu1ba.
.su1vi.
.ma1ja.
.va1ba.
.on1gi.
.pi1di.
.kü1si.
.ra1hu.
.Ma1ja.
.sõ1nu.
.va1na.
.sa1lu.
.li1gi.
.la1ka.
.as1tu.
.va1ra.
.vä1he.
.am1mu.
.al1la.
.lu1gu.
.tõ1si.
.pe1sa.
.ku1ri.
.el1lu.
.ma1ge.
.El1lu.
.lu1ba.
.ta1lu.
.ae1ga.
.ta1ba.
.ta1ga.
.Me1ri.
.Mi1ne.
.en1ne.
.sä1ra.
.Ju1ba.
.va1ti.
.ük1si.
.ol1la.
.ju1ba.
.Te1da.
.il1ma.
.ho1bu.
.ko1gu.
.kä1te.
.li1na.
.il1me.
.la1he.
.et1te.
.pü1ha.
.mõ1ni.
.sa1ma.
.ku1na.
.vä1ga.
.lu1mi.
.va1ja.
.ne1li.
.mi1da.
.ta1su.
.er1ru.
.õn1ne.
.vi1ga.
.ai1va.
.pe1re.
.kä1ra.
.Ku1na.
.ni1na.
.ra1da.
.ni1mi.
.ol1gu.
.ra1ha.
.ta1re.
.mõ1ne.
.la1pi.
.en1da.
.ko1ju.
